Arkansas, session 2025, SB93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Education - Shared Services for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC004 SECRETARY OF EDUCATION 1 GRADE SE05
(2) E080C ADE CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE04
(3) U089U DHE DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(4) G331C ADE CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE SE01
(5) D011N ADE DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS 1 GRADE SE01
(6) N009N ASST COMMISSIONER FISCAL & ADMIN SVCS 1 GRADE SE01
*KMW005*
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(7) D147C ADE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT12
(8) D146C ADE ENTERPRISE ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT11
(9) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(10) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE IT09
(11) D104C ADE STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT08
(12) D006C SOFTWARE ENGINEER LEAD 1 GRADE IT08
(13) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE IT07
(14) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(15) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT06
(16) D047C INFORMATION SYSTEMS BUSINESS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(17) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 1 GRADE IT05
(18) G001N ADE LITIGATION ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS15
(19) G281C ADE POLICY & SPECIAL PROJECTS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(20) N002N DHE SENIOR ASSOC DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS15
(21) N069N ADE SPECIAL ADVISOR 1 GRADE GS14
(22) E001N ADE COORDINATOR SPECIAL PROGRAMS 2 GRADE GS13
(23) G012C ADE ASSISTANT TO DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS12
(24) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(25) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(26) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(27) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(28) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS11
(29) E006C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(30) E061C ACE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(31) G075C ADE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(32) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(33) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(34) E016C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(35) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(36) A032C ADE FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(37) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(38) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(39) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(40) E019C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM ADVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(41) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 2 GRADE GS08
(42) E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(43) G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(44) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(45) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(46) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(47) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(48) S008C CAMPUS MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(49) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(50) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 1 GRADE GS07
(51) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(52) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 2 GRADE GS07
(53) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(54) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(55) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(56) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(57) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(58) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(59) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(60) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(61) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(62) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(63) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 88

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Education - Shared Services Paying
Account for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: six (6) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Education -
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $6,769,373
(02) EXTRA HELP 80,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,227,462
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $9,486,835

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education - State Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) E083C ADE DEPUTY SECRETARY OF EDUCATION 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U027U DEPUTY COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION 1 GRADE SE03
(3) E081C ADE ASSOCIATE DEPUTY 3 GRADE SE02
(4) N005N ADE ASST COMMISSIONER LEARNING SERVICES 1 GRADE SE01
(5) N006N ADE ASST COMMISSIONER PUB SCH ACCOUNT 1 GRADE SE01
(6) N008N ASST COMMISSIONER RESEARCH & TECHNOLOGY 1 GRADE SE01
(7) N010N ASST COMMR EDUC EFFECTIVENESS 1 GRADE SE01
(8) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE MP02
(9) D104C ADE STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 4 GRADE IT08
(10) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(11) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(12) D047C INFORMATION SYSTEMS BUSINESS ANALYST 2 GRADE IT05
(13) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(14) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(15) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(16) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE IT02
(17) E082C ADE PROGRAM DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(18) N069N ADE SPECIAL ADVISOR 7 GRADE GS14
(19) E003N ADE COORD SCH. IMP / STANDARDS ASSUR 1 GRADE GS13
(20) E001N ADE COORDINATOR SPECIAL PROGRAMS 7 GRADE GS13
(21) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(22) G012C ADE ASSISTANT TO DIRECTOR 8 GRADE GS12
(23) G006C ADE SPECIAL EDUCATION DIVISION MGR 1 GRADE GS12
(24) N145N DHS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR CMS 1 GRADE GS12
(25) E006N ADE COORD COMPUTER SCIENCE 1 GRADE GS11
(26) E069C ADE DIRECTOR OF MEDICAID IN THE SCHOOLS 1 GRADE GS11
(27) E006C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM MANAGER 11 GRADE GS11
(28) E007C ADE OERZ DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS10
(29) G075C ADE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 5 GRADE GS10
(30) E016C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 19 GRADE GS10
(31) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 8 GRADE GS09
(32) G074C ADE COORD OF GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS 1 GRADE GS09
(33) A032C ADE FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS09
(34) X012C ADE PLSB CHIEF INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS09
(35) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(36) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(37) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 4 GRADE GS09
(38) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(39) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(40) E019C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM ADVISOR 93 GRADE GS09
(41) E066C DCCECE EDUCATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(42) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(43) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(44) A047C FINANCIAL ANALYST II 1 GRADE GS08
(45) L043C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS08
(46) L035C NUTRITIONIST CONSULTANT 9 GRADE GS08
(47) G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(48) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(49) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 6 GRADE GS08
(50) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 9 GRADE GS07
(51) G267C DHS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(52) M042C DHS STAFF SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(53) G182C DHS/DDS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(54) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(55) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(56) M025C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR I 1 GRADE GS07
(57) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(58) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(59) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 11 GRADE GS06
(60) M053C CHILD CARE SERVICE SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(61) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS06
(62) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 3 GRADE GS06
(63) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(64) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(65) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(66) X094C SERVICES & PROGRAM LICENSING SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS06
(67) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(68) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(69) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS05
(70) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 28 GRADE GS04
(71) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(72) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 17 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 335

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education - State Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: eight (8)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $13,832,717
(02) EXTRA HELP 160,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,877,933
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,411,057
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 60,000
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,466,707

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL GRANTS ADMINISTRATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Education -
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Grants
Administration for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $254,677
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 88,477
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 49,970
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 19,672
(C) PROF. FEES 260,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $672,796

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - BUILDING MAINTENANCE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Educational Buildings Maintenance Fund, for operating expenses of the
Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education -
Building Maintenance for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $500,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - REVOLVING LOAN CERTIFICATES PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from
the Education Revolving Loan Certificates Fund, for personal services,
operating expenses, and loans to school districts by the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Revolving Loan
Certificates Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $54,790
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 20,856
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 27,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,500
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(04) LOANS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS 13,000,000
(05) LOANS TO OPEN-ENROLLMENT PUBLIC
CHARTER SCHOOLS 10,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $23,115,646

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - CHILD NUTRITION PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the federal
funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services, operating expenses, aid and reimbursements of the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Child Nutrition
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,102,049
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 418,594
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,172,100
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE/NUTRITION ED 425,099,000
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 450,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $428,401,743

SECTION 11. EXTRA HELP - FEDERAL ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION.
There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Elementary and Secondary
Education for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: four (4) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services, operating expenses, aid and reimbursements of
the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
- Federal Elementary and Secondary Education for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,280,286
(02) EXTRA HELP 60,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,607,708
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 91,242,005
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,500,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) ENTITLEMENT GRANT PROGRAMS 1,181,835,058
(06) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 1,110,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,281,935,057

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - MULTIPLE GRANT AWARD PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses and grants by the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Multiple Grant
Award Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $422,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 16,500
(C) PROF. FEES 40,000
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) MULTIPLE GRANT AWARDS 1,900,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,478,500

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for Medicaid reimbursement and administration of the
Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education -
Medicaid Reimbursement Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $13,659,017
(02) MEDICAID ADMIN 10,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $13,669,517

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - ALTERNATIVE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses and grants by the
Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education -
Alternative Certification Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $27,367
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,500
(C) PROF. FEES 35,420
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) ALT. CERT. PROG. GRANTS AND AID 827,925
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $899,212

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - CONFERENCES. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in
the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for operating expenses of conferences sponsored by the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Conferences for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $400,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $475,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION CLAIMING PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for reimbursement of school districts for
administrative activities that support the Arkansas Medicaid Program of the
Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education -
Medicaid Administration Claiming Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AR MEDICAID ADMIN CLAIMS $45,000,000

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS BETTER CHANCE PROGRAM -
ADMINISTRATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Education, to be payable from the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education -
Arkansas Better Chance Program - Administration for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $611,206
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 231,426
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,245,291
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,917
(C) PROF. FEES 297,610
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,389,450

SECTION 19. REGULAR SALARIES - PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE STANDARDS BOARD.
There is hereby established for the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Professional Licensure Standards Board
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(2) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(3) X202C ADE PLSB SENIOR INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(4) X037C EDUCATION INVESTIGATOR 3 GRADE GS08
(5) G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(6) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(7) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(8) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 11

03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE STANDARDS BOARD.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and
grants by the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education - Professional Licensure Standards Board for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $629,772
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 235,810
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 376,325
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 9,505
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) EDTPA PROGRAM GRANTS 100,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,411,412

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - OPEN ENROLLMENT PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
CLOSURE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for outstanding obligations incurred
by closed charter schools of the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Open Enrollment Public Charter School
Closure for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHARTER SCHOOL CLOSURE $300,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - SAVE THE CHILDREN GRANT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account, for a grant for statewide
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
in-school, summer, and after school literacy, nutrition, home visiting, and
early childhood programs to be administered by Save the Children for low
income, at-risk children by the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Save the Children Grant for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SAVE THE CHILDREN GRANTS $500,000

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account, for School Safety Grants
by the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education - School Safety Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS $50,000,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - EDUCATIONAL FREEDOM ACCOUNTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Fund, for Educational Freedom
Accounts by the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education - Educational Freedom Accounts for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EDUCATIONAL FREEDOM ACCOUNTS $277,487,318

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - ASTHMA TRAINING AND TREATMENT PROGRAM GRANTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for grants for expenses related to providing
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
asthma treatment in local school districts, asthma treatment equipment for
school districts, school personnel training, and monitoring and tracking of
asthma cases in local public school districts by the Department of Education
- Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ASTHMA TRAINING AND TREATMENT PROGRAM GRANTS $1,000,000

SECTION 26. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD. Notwithstanding any law pertaining to the transfer of year-end
fund balances or any law to the contrary, any funds which remain in the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account at the end of a
fiscal year shall remain in the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education Fund Account and be made available to fund appropriation(s)
authorized by law and made payable from the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education Fund Account for the following fiscal year.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized
herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement
set forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee all
amounts carried forward by the September Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the
Agency, Board, Commission or Institution and the amount of the funding
carried forward, the program name or line item, the funding source of that
appropriation and a copy of the written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a
written report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL, AND TEMPORARY LAW. SCHOOL
SAFETY SET-ASIDE.
(a) (1) The Department of Education shall not begin the process of
promulgating rules for the distribution of funds in the School Safety Set-
Aside or Contingency Vote 3/5 Set-Aside until authorized by Legislative
Council.
(2) The department shall not disburse any funds in the School Safety
Set-Aside or Contingency Vote 3/5 Set-Aside until the rules have been
approved by Legislative Council.
(b) Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State may from time to time transfer on his or her books and those of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State funds from the Restricted Reserve
Fund School Safety Set-Aside or Contingency Vote 3/5 Set-Aside after
receiving prior approval of the greater of three-fifths (3/5) of the quorum
present or a majority of the membership of the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, for the
Department of Education to distribute funds for the School Safety Grant
program, as approved in this section as set out in subsection (a) herein, or
for the distribution of funds from this set-aside for unanticipated state
needs.
(c)(1) The General Assembly finds:
(A) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and funding for a
state agency or institution each fiscal year is the prerogative of the
General Assembly;
(B) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and funding for a
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
state agency or institution is usually accomplished by delineating the
maximum amounts in the appropriation acts for the state agency or institution
and in the general revenue allocations authorized for each relevant fund and
fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et
seq.; and
(C) The Restricted Reserve Fund has established procedures for the
transfer of funds to various funds and fund accounts for the efficient and
effective operation of state government.
(2)(A) It is necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as
provided in § 19-5-1263(c).
(B) The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, is not a
severable part of § 19-5-1263.
(C) If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, § 19-5-1263(c)-(e) are
void in their entirety.
(d) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ESTABLISHMENT OF A "POSITION POOL". (a) To address needs emerging from
statewide education issues and the necessity of recruiting and retaining
qualified personnel, the Arkansas Department of Education or its successor
agency is authorized for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year a pool of no
more than five (5) Information Technology positions at a salary not to exceed
the maximum salary for a grade IT12. These positions are to be used by the
Department of Education in the event that the personal services needs of the
Department during the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year require additional
positions, either by title or in number, that are not authorized by the
General Assembly in the Regular Salaries section of this Act. These positions
may also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not
have a vacant position available with the appropriate title and salary level.
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
(b) To address needs emerging from statewide education issues and the
necessity of recruiting and retaining qualified personnel, the Arkansas
Department of Education or its successor agency is authorized for the 2024-
2025 2025-2026 fiscal year a pool of ten (10) General Salaries positions at
up to a grade GS15. These positions are to be used by the Department of
Education in the event that the personal services needs of the Department
during the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year require additional positions,
either by classification or in number, that are not authorized by the General
Assembly in the Regular Salaries section of this Act. These positions may
also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not have
a vacant position available with the appropriate title and grade level.
(c) Any salary determinations or adjustments administered under the
provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be made by
comparing the qualifications and salary levels of similar employees in school
districts or in other state education agencies.
(d) The Department of Education is authorized to access the pool
positions authorized in this Section at any time when it is determined by the
Secretary that the need exists. The Secretary shall provide a monthly report
of the justification for the need to allocate titles from this growth pool to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council
or Joint Budget Committee for review. The report shall also include an
accounting of the names, titles, and salaries of personnel whose salaries
have been adjusted under provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this
Section.
(e) If the Department of Education requests continuation of any
"Position Pool" position(s) as established herein during the next fiscal
year, the position(s) must be requested as a new position(s) in the agency’s
budget request.
(f) Determining the number of personnel to be employed by a state agency
is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating the maximum number of personnel by identifying job titles and the
maximum grade or salary attached to those titles. The General Assembly has
determined that the Arkansas Department of Education could be operated more
efficiently if some flexibility is given to that agency. That flexibility is
being accomplished by providing a position pool in Subsections (a) and (b) of
this Section and since the General Assembly has granted the agency broad
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
powers under the growth pool concept, it is both necessary and appropriate
that the General Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the
position pool by requiring review of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee in the utilization of the position pool. Therefore, the requirement
of review by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of review by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 29. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SHARED SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a
Shared Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Education.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 30. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/31/25 SB93
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 31. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 32. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee











03-31-2025 17:29:29 KMW005